Utah statutes.
26-7-2.5.   American Indian-Alaskan Native Health Liaison -- Duties.

(1)  As used in this section:

(a)  "Health care" means care, treatment, service, or a procedure to improve, maintain, diagnose, or otherwise affect an individual's physical or mental condition.

(b)  "Liaison" means the American Indian-Alaskan Native Health Liaison appointed under this section.

(2)  Subject to budget constraints, the executive director shall appoint an individual as the American Indian-Alaskan Native Health Liaison.

(3)  The liaison shall on behalf of the executive director and the department:

(a)  promote and coordinate collaborative efforts between the department and Utah's American Indian population to improve the availability and accessibility of quality health care impacting Utah's American Indian populations on and off reservations;

(b)  interact with the following to improve health disparities for Utah's American Indian populations:

(i)  tribal health programs;

(ii)  local health departments;

(iii)  state agencies and officials; and

(iv)  providers of health care in the private sector;

(c)  facilitate education, training, and technical assistance regarding public health and medical assistance programs to Utah's American Indian populations; and

(d)  staff an advisory board by which Utah's tribes may consult with state and local agencies for the development and improvement of public health programs designed to address improved health care for Utah's American Indian populations on and off the reservation.

(4)  The liaison shall annually report the liaison's activities and accomplishments to the Native American Legislative Liaison Committee created in Section 36-22-1.



Enacted by Chapter 192, 2011 General Session

